Washington statutes.
RCW 32.32.420

Availability for conferences in advance of filing of application—Refusal of prefiling review.

(1) The staff of the director shall be available for conferences with prospective applicants or their representatives in advance of filing an application to convert. These conferences may be held for the purpose of discussing generally the problems confronting an applicant in effecting conversion or to resolve specific problems of an unusual nature.

(2) Prefiling review of an application may be refused by the staff of the director if the review would delay the examination and processing of material which has already been filed or would favor certain applicants at the expense of others. In any conference under this section, the staff of the director shall not undertake to prepare material for filing but shall limit itself to indicating the kind of information required, leaving the actual drafting to the applicant and its representatives.

[ 1994 c 92 s 393; 1981 c 85 s 83.]